California statutes. Insurance Code
(a) (1) The Medi-Cal-to-Healthy Families Bridge Benefits Program is hereby established to provide any child who meets the criteria set forth in subdivision (b) with a one calendar-month period of health care benefits in order to provide the child with an opportunity to apply for the Healthy Families Program established under Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 12693).

(2) The Medi-Cal-to-Healthy Families Bridge Benefits Program shall be administered by the board and the State Department of Health Care Services.

(b) (1) Any child who meets all of the following requirements shall be eligible for one calendar month of Healthy Families benefits funded by Title XXI of the Social Security Act, known as the State Children’s Health Insurance Program:

(A) He or she has been receiving, but is no longer eligible for, full-scope Medi-Cal benefits without a share of cost.

(B) He or she is eligible for full-scope Medi-Cal benefits with a share of cost.

(C) He or she is under 19 years of age at the time he or she is no longer eligible for full-scope Medi-Cal benefits without a share of cost.

(D) He or she has family income at or below 200 percent of the federal poverty level.

(E) He or she is not otherwise excluded under the definition of “targeted low-income child” under subsections (b)(1)(B)(ii), (b)(1)(C), and (b)(2) of Section 2110 of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Secs. 1397jj(b)(1)(B)(ii), 1397jj(b)(1)(C), and 1397jj(b)(2)).

(2) The one calendar month of benefits under this chapter shall begin on the first day of the month following the last day of the receipt of benefits without a share of cost.

(c) The income methodology for determining a child’s family income, as required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) shall be the same methodology used in determining a child’s eligibility for the full scope of Medi-Cal benefits.

(d) The one calendar-month period of Healthy Families benefits provided under this chapter shall be identical to the scope of benefits that the child was receiving under the Medi-Cal program without a share of cost.

(e) The one calendar-month period of Healthy Families benefits provided under this chapter shall only be made available through a Medi-Cal provider or under a Medi-Cal managed care arrangement or contract.

(f) Except as provided in subdivision (j), nothing in this section shall be construed to provide Healthy Families benefits for more than a one calendar-month period under any circumstances, including the failure to apply for benefits under the Healthy Families Program or the failure to be made aware of the availability of the Healthy Families Program, unless the circumstances described in subdivision (b) reoccur.

(g) (1) This section shall become operative on the first day of the second month following the effective date of this section, subject to paragraph (2).

(2) Under no circumstances shall this section become operative until, and shall be implemented only to the extent that, all necessary federal approvals, including approval of any amendments to the State Child Health Plan have been sought and obtained and federal financial participation under the federal State Children’s Health Insurance Program, as set forth in Title XXI of the Social Security Act, has been approved.

(h) This section shall become inoperative if an unappealable court decision or judgment determines that any of the following apply:

(1) The provisions of this section are unconstitutional under the United States Constitution or the California Constitution.

(2) The provisions of this section do not comply with the State Children’s Health Insurance Program, as set forth in Title XXI of the Social Security Act.

(3) The provisions of this section require that the health care benefits provided pursuant to this section are required to be furnished for more than two calendar months.

(i) If the State Child Health Insurance Program waiver described in Section 12693.755 is approved, and at the time the waiver is implemented, the benefits described in this section shall also be available to persons who meet the eligibility requirements of the program and are parents of, or, as defined by the board, adults responsible for, children enrolled to receive coverage under this part or enrolled to receive full-scope Medi-Cal services with no share of cost.

(j) The one month of benefits provided in this section shall be increased to two months commencing on implementation of the waiver referred to in Section 12693.755.

(k) This section shall cease to be implemented on the date that the Director of Health Care Services executes a declaration stating that implementation of the Healthy Families Presumptive Eligibility Program established pursuant to Section 12693.98a has commenced, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 483, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Section operative as prescribed in subd. (g).   Conditionally inoperative as provided in subd. (h).   Repealed as of date prescribed in subd. (k).   Note: Operational conditions in subd. (g) originated in the addition by Stats. 1998, Ch. 310.)
-------------------------------------------

12693.98a.

(a) (1) The Healthy Families Presumptive Eligibility Program is hereby established to provide any child who meets the criteria set forth in subdivision (b) with presumptive eligibility benefits until the board has determined the child’s eligibility for the Healthy Families Program.

(2) The Healthy Families Presumptive Eligibility Program shall be administered by the board.

(b) (1) Any child who meets both of the following requirements shall be eligible for presumptive eligibility benefits under the Healthy Families Presumptive Eligibility Program:

(A) He or she has been receiving, but is no longer eligible for, full-scope Medi-Cal benefits without a share of cost, or he or she is eligible for full-scope Medi-Cal benefits with a share of cost.

(B) He or she otherwise appears to meet the income eligibility criteria for the Healthy Families Program.

(2) The presumptive eligibility benefits under this section shall begin on the first day of the month following the last day of the receipt of Medi-Cal benefits without a share of cost. Presumptive eligibility benefits under this section shall terminate at the end of the month in which a child’s effective date in the Healthy Families Program begins or the end of the month in which the board determines that the child is not eligible for the Healthy Families Program. If the board determines that the child is eligible for the Healthy Families Program, the board shall enroll the child in the Healthy Families Program without an interruption in coverage. If the board determines that the child is ineligible for the Healthy Families Program, the board shall terminate the child’s benefits under the Healthy Families Presumptive Eligibility Program.

(c) The income methodology for determining a child’s family income for the purposes of the Healthy Families Presumptive Eligibility Program, as required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), shall be the same methodology used in determining a child’s eligibility for the full scope of Medi-Cal benefits.

(d) The scope of presumptive eligibility benefits provided under the Healthy Families Presumptive Eligibility Program shall be identical to the scope of benefits that the child was receiving under the Medi-Cal program without a share of cost.

(e) The presumptive eligibility benefits provided under this section shall only be made available through a Medi-Cal provider or under a Medi-Cal managed care arrangement or contract.

(f) When an application is forwarded by the county to the Healthy Families Program, the county shall send the application to the Healthy Families Program via an electronic application format defined by the department, provided that the department has implemented the automated interfaces necessary to accomplish electronic submission of applications from the county to the Healthy Families Program without requiring duplicative data entry by the county. The transmission of the electronic application to the Healthy Families Program shall occur within the timeframes designated by the department.

(g) To the extent necessary, the department and the board may exchange a child’s case file solely for the purpose of determining the child’s eligibility for the Medi-Cal program or the Healthy Families Program, without requiring the family’s consent, to the extent allowed by federal law. Any information, including the child’s case file, shall be kept confidential by the department and the board pursuant to state and federal law, and it shall be used only for the determination or continuation of eligibility.

(h) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department shall implement this section by means of all-county letters or similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action. Thereafter, the department may adopt regulations, as necessary, to implement this section in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(i) This section shall be implemented when the state has sought and obtained approval of any amendments to its state plan necessary to implement the changes to this section, pursuant to this act, and has obtained funding under Title XXI of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1397aa et seq.) for the provision of benefits under this section. Until the changes to this section, made by this act, are implemented, the Medi-Cal to Healthy Families Bridge Program established pursuant to Section 12693.98 shall remain in effect. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and only when all necessary federal approvals have been obtained by the state, this section shall be implemented only to the extent federal financial participation under Title XXI of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1397aa et seq.) is available to fund benefits provided under this section.

(j) Upon implementation of the Healthy Families Presumptive Eligibility Program pursuant to this section, the Director of Health Care Services shall execute a declaration, which shall be retained by the director, stating that implementation of the section has commenced.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 483, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

12693.981.

(a) (1) The Healthy Families-to-Medi-Cal Bridge Benefits Program is hereby established to provide any person enrolled for coverage under this part who meets the criteria set forth in subdivision (b) with a two calendar-month period of health care benefits in order to provide the person with an opportunity to apply for Medi-Cal.

(2) The Healthy Families-to-Medi-Cal Bridge Benefits Program shall be administered by the board.

(b) (1) Any person who meets all of the following requirements shall be eligible for two additional calendar months of Healthy Families benefits:

(A) He or she has been receiving, but is no longer eligible for, benefits under the program.

(B) He or she appears to be income eligible for full-scope Medi-Cal benefits without a share of cost.

(2) The two additional calendar months of benefits under this chapter shall begin on the first day of the month following the last day of the person’s eligibility for benefits under the program.

(c) The two-calendar-month period of Healthy Families benefits provided under this chapter shall be identical to the scope of benefits that the person was receiving under the program.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to provide Healthy Families benefits for more than a two calendar-month period under any circumstances, including the failure to apply for benefits under the Medi-Cal program or the failure to be made aware of the availability of the Medi-Cal program unless the circumstances described in subdivision (b) reoccur.

(e) This section shall become inoperative if an unappealable court decision or judgment determines that any of the following apply:

(1) The provisions of this section are unconstitutional under the United States Constitution or the California Constitution.

(2) The provisions of this section do not comply with the State Children’s Health Insurance Program, as set forth in Title XXI of the federal Social Security Act.

(3) The provisions of this section require that the health care benefits provided pursuant to this section are required to be furnished for more than two calendar months.

(f) The board shall cease to provide the benefits described in this section to any additional individuals on the date that the State Department of Health Care Services implements the presumptive eligibility program established pursuant to Section 14011.65b of the Welfare and Institutions Code and the Director of Health Care Services executes a declaration pursuant to subdivision (d) of that section stating that the program of presumptive eligibility has commenced. The board shall consult and coordinate with the State Department of Health Care Services in implementing presumptive eligibility under Section 14011.65b of the Welfare and Institutions Code for these individuals.

(g) This section shall be repealed six months after the board ceases to provide benefits to additional individuals pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 188, Sec. 20.   Effective August 24, 2007.   Repealed as of date prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

12693.982.

For purposes of this chapter, “Medi-Cal” means the state health care program established pursuant to Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 171, Sec. 17.   Effective August 10, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

12694.

(a) The board and the department, in collaboration with program offices for the California Special Supplemental Food Program for Women, Infants, and Children (WIC or the WIC program), local WIC agencies, counties in their capacity of making Medi-Cal eligibility determinations, advocates, information technology specialists, and other stakeholders, shall design, promulgate, and implement policies and procedures for an automated enrollment gateway system developed by the department and the board that performs, but is not limited to performing, the following functions:

(1) To the extent that federal financial participation is available, allowing children applying to the WIC program to submit a simple electronic application to simultaneously obtain presumptive eligibility for Medi-Cal and Healthy Families under Title XIX (42) U.S.C. 1396 et seq.) and Title XXI (42 U.S.C. 1397aa et seq.) of the Social Security Act and apply for enrollment into the Medi-Cal program or the Healthy Families Program with the consent of their parent or guardian.

(2) Modify the existing WIC enrollment system to obtain the minimum required data for enrollment in Medi-Cal and Healthy Families in order to provide an electronic transactional platform that is connected to the simple electronic application referenced in paragraph (1) and allowing for an interface between that application, the Medi-Cal Eligibility Data System (MEDS), and the Medi-Cal program or the Healthy Families Program, as relevant.

(3) Providing an automated real-time connection with MEDS for the purpose of checking an applicant’s enrollment status.

(4) Allowing for the electronic transfer of information to the Medi-Cal program or the Healthy Families Program, as relevant, for the purpose of making the final eligibility determination.

(5) Checking, as relevant, available government databases for the purpose of electronically receiving information that is necessary to allow the Medi-Cal program or the Healthy Families Program to complete the eligibility determination. The department and the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board shall comply with all applicable privacy and confidentiality provisions under federal and state law.

(b) The automated enrollment gateway system shall be constructed with the capacity to be used by entities operating the WIC program.

(c) The WIC application process shall be modified to provide an electronic application described in subdivision (a), which shall contain the information necessary to apply for the automated enrollment gateway system, supplemented by information required to apply for enrollment into the Medi-Cal program or the Healthy Families Program.

(d) Benefits for applicants opting to simultaneously obtain presumptive eligibility for enrollment under this section shall continue until a final eligibility determination is made for the Medi-Cal program or the Healthy Families Program pursuant to Section 14011.8 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(e) Operation of the automated enrollment gateway system for the WIC program shall occur within a timely and appropriate period as determined by the department and the board, in consultation with the stakeholders as provided in subdivision (a) subject to a specific appropriation being provided for that purpose in the Budget Act or in subsequent legislation. The automated enrollment gateway system shall comply with all applicable confidentiality and privacy protection in federal and state law and regulation.

(f) The WIC program shall collect income and residency information necessary for the Medi-Cal program and the Healthy Families Program documentation requirements for applications submitted through the automated enrollment gateway system. To the extent allowed by the federal government, the Medi-Cal and Healthy Families programs shall rely on income information obtained by WIC and upon the income verification process performed by WIC. The Medi-Cal and Healthy Families programs shall collect and verify citizenship and immigration information as required under those programs.

(g) Consistent with the provisions of this section, the Medi-Cal and Healthy Families programs may collect additional information needed to verify eligibility in those programs.

(h) Counties shall accept and process for a Medi-Cal eligibility determination applications provided by the WIC gateway system and ensure timely processing of these applications and a timely eligibility determination and ending of presumptive eligibility.

(i) The presumptive eligibility benefits provided under this section shall be identical to the benefits provided to children who receive full-scope Medi-Cal benefits without a share of cost, and shall only be made available through a Medi-Cal provider.

(j) The confidentiality and privacy protections set forth in Sections 10850 and 14100.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and all other confidentiality and privacy protections in federal and state law and regulation shall apply to all children and families using the automated enrollment gateway system as described in this section.

(k) The state shall promote and offer support to the WIC program for the use of the simple electronic application and the automated enrollment gateway system.

(l) The board shall seek approval of any amendments to the state plan necessary to implement this section, in accordance with Title XXI (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1397aa et seq.) of the federal Social Security Act.

(m) The department shall seek approval of any amendments to the state plan necessary to implement this section, in accordance with Title XIX (42 U.S.C. 1396 et seq.) of the federal Social Security Act. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, only when all necessary federal approvals have been obtained shall this section be implemented.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 328, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 16.2. Transition of Healthy Families Program Enrollees to Medi-Cal [12694.1. - 12694.2.]

12694.1.

(a) Pursuant to Sections 14005.26 and 14005.27 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, subscribers enrolled in the Healthy Families Program pursuant to this part shall, no sooner than January 1, 2013, transition to the Medi-Cal program pursuant to Sections 14005.26 and 14005.27 of the Welfare and Institutions Code to the extent they are otherwise eligible. AIM-linked infants, as defined in Section 12695.03, with incomes above 250 percent of the federal poverty level are exempt from this transition.

(b) The board shall coordinate with the State Department of Health Care Services to implement Sections 14005.26 and 14005.27 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(c) The board’s actions to coordinate with
 the State Department of Health Care Services to implement Sections 14005.26 and 14005.27 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, as specified in subdivision (b), shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Notwithstanding Section 12693.74, disenrollment of subscribers in the manner, and at the times, specified in Section 14005.27 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The board may retain a subscriber in the program for longer than 12 months if needed to ensure a smooth transition to the Medi-Cal program.

(2) In coordination with the State Department of Health Care Services, provision of reasonable notice to applicants concerning disenrollment of subscribers consistent with Section 14005.27 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(3) Notwithstanding Section 12693.51, transfers of subscribers from one
 participating plan to another at the times and under the conditions prescribed by the board, without the obligation that the board provide an annual opportunity for subscribers to transfer from one participating plan to another.

(d) Nothing in subdivision (e) of Section 12693.43 shall be construed to require any refund or adjustment of family contributions if an applicant has paid for three months of required family contributions in advance and the subscriber for whom the applicant has paid these family contributions is disenrolled pursuant to this section, or for any other reason, without receiving a fourth consecutive month of coverage.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the board shall, without taking any further regulatory action, implement, interpret, or make
 specific this section by means of business rules, program bulletins, program correspondence to subscribers and contractors, letters, or similar instructions.

(2) The board may adopt and readopt emergency regulations implementing this section. The adoption and readoption, by the board, of regulations implementing this section shall be deemed an emergency and necessary to avoid serious harm to the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code, and the board is hereby exempted from the requirement that it describe facts showing the need for immediate action and from review by the Office of Administrative Law.

(f) The Healthy Families Program, pursuant to this part, shall cease to enroll new subscribers no sooner than the date transition begins pursuant to subdivision (a), and any transition of children shall be in
 compliance with the implementation plan or plans as contained in Section 14005.27 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 76, Sec. 141.   (AB 383)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

12694.2.

All civil service employees who are currently employed by the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board, whose functions are transferred to the State Department of Health Care Services as a result of the act adding this section, shall retain their positions, status, and rights pursuant to Section 19050.9 of the Government Code and the State Civil Service Act (Part 2 (commencing with Section 18500) of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 28, Sec. 8.   (AB 1494)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 6.8. Program Transfers [12739.77. - 12739.79.]

12739.77.

For the purposes of this part, the following terms have the following meanings: 

(a) “Board” means the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board. 

(b) “Employee” means permanent or probationary civil service employee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 448, Sec. 2.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

12739.78.

(a) (1) If any statute dissolves or terminates the board, any employee of the board who, immediately prior to the effective date of the dissolution or termination of the board, was assigned to the Healthy Families Program (Part 6.2 (commencing with Section 12693)), the Access for Infants and Mothers Program (Part 6.3 (commencing with Section 12695)), the County Health Initiative Matching Fund (Part 6.4 (commencing with Section 12699.50)), or the Major Risk Medical Insurance Program (Part 6.5 (commencing with Section 12700)) shall be transferred to the State Department of Health Care Services and shall retain his or her status, position, and rights pursuant to Section 19050.9 of the Government Code and the State Civil Service Act (Part 2 (commencing with Section
 18500) and Part 2.6 (commencing with Section 19815) of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(2) If employees are transferred to the State Department of Health Care Services pursuant to this subdivision, the department shall prepare a report on the transfer of employees, and, if applicable, any functions transferred to the department upon dissolution or termination of the board. The report shall, at a minimum, describe any assignment of new activities to transferred employees and provide workload justification for the position authority transferred pursuant to this subdivision. The department shall submit the report to the fiscal and relevant policy committees of the Legislature by February 1 of the year following the year in which employees are transferred, and shall update the report, if necessary, by February 1 of each of the two years following submission of the report. The report may be included with any budget information
 submitted by the department to those committees.

(b) (1) If any statute dissolves or terminates the board, any employee of the board who, immediately prior to the effective date of the dissolution or termination of the board, was assigned to the Federal Temporary High Risk Pool (Part 6.6 (commencing with Section 12739.5) and Part 6.7 (commencing with Section 12739.70)) shall be transferred to the California Health Benefit Exchange and shall retain his or her status, position, and rights pursuant to Section 19050.9 of the Government Code and the State Civil Service Act (Part 2 (commencing with Section 18500) and Part 2.6 (commencing with Section 19815) of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(2) This subdivision shall not apply to any employee who has transferred to the California Health Benefit Exchange pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section
 12739.61 or Section 12739.79.

(c) If any statute dissolves or terminates the board, an employee’s applicable reinstatement rights that would have applied to the board shall instead apply to the State Department of Health Care Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 41.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

12739.79.

Any permanent or probationary civil service employee who is employed by the board and assigned to the Federal Temporary High Risk Pool (Part 6.6 (commencing with Section 12739.5) and Part 6.7 (commencing with Section 12739.70)) and whose function ceases due to Section 12739.61 shall immediately be transferred to the California Health Benefit Exchange and shall retain his or her status, position, and rights pursuant to Section 19050.9 of the Government Code and the State Civil Service Act (Part 2 (commencing with Section 18500) and Part 2.6 (commencing with Section 19815) of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 42.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 7. HOME PROTECTION [12740. - 12764.]



  CHAPTER 1. Definitions and Licensing [12740. - 12745.]

12740.

The definitions used in this section govern the construction and terms used in this part but shall not affect any other provisions of this code:

(a) “Home protection contract” means a contract or agreement whereby a person, other than a builder, seller, or lessor of the home which is the subject of the contract, undertakes for a specified period of time, for a predetermined fee, to repair or replace all or any part of any component, system or appliance of a home necessitated by wear and tear, deterioration or inherent defect, arising during the effective period of the contract, and, in the event of an inspection conducted pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 12761, by the failure of that inspection to detect the likelihood of any such loss.

Such contract shall provide for a system of service for effectuating such repair or replacement and shall not include protection against consequential damage from the failure of any component, system or appliance.

(b) “Home protection company” means any person licensed pursuant to this part which issues home protection contracts.

(c) “Protection contract fee” means the consideration received, or to be received, by a home protection company for the issuance of any home protection contract.

A home protection contract fee shall be the fee established by a home protection company for coverage extending one year from the effective date of the contract. Where initial coverage is provided for a period in excess of one year, the home protection contract fee shall be the annual fee, plus a separately stated pro rata portion of the annual fee for the period of coverage which exceeds one year.

(d) “Home” or “residential property” as used in this part means any single or multiple unit or units, including mobilehomes, (as defined in Health and Safety Code Section 18211) used primarily for residential purposes.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 820) by Stats. 1987, Ch. 664, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

12741.

This part shall not apply to:

(a) Performance guarantees or service contracts given by either the builder of a home or the manufacturer or seller of an appliance or other system or component, whether or not an identifiable charge is made for such guarantee or service contract.

(b) Any service contract, guarantee, or warranty intending to guarantee or warrant the repairs or service of a home appliance, system or component, provided such service contract, guarantee, or warranty is issued by a person who has sold, serviced, repaired or provided replacement of that appliance, system or component at the time of, or prior to issuance of the contract, guarantee, or warranty; and, provided, further, that the person issuing the service contract, guarantee, or warranty does not engage in the business of a home protection company.

(c) The provider of any pest control service agreement pursuant to Section 8516 of the Business and Professions Code.

(d) This section shall become operative January 1, 2004.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 2) and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 523, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.   Section operative January 1, 2004, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

12742.

Home protection contracts and home protection companies, and all matters incident to or concerned with such contracts and companies, shall be exclusively subject to and regulated by the provisions of this part and, except as provided in Section 12743, shall not be governed by any other provision of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1203.)
-------------------------------------------

12743.

The following provisions of this code shall be applicable to home protection contracts and home protection companies:

(a) Sections 1 to 46, inclusive.

(b) Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 330) of Part 1, Division 1.

(c) Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 679.70) of Part 1, Division 1.

(d) These provisions of Chapter 1, Part 2, Division 1:

(1) Article 1 (commencing with Section 680).

(2) Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 685).

(3) Article 2 (commencing with Section 690).

(4) Section 699, 699.5, 700, 701, 704, 704.5, 704.7, 705, 705.1, 707, 708, 709, 710, 713, 714, 715, 716, 717, 718, 720, and 725 of Article 3 (commencing with Section 699).

(5) Section 750.

(6) Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 770).

(7) Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 790).

(8) Article 8 (commencing with Section 820).

(9) Article 9 (commencing with Section 880).

(10) Article 11 (commencing with Section 939).

(11) Article 13 (commencing with Section 980).

(12) Article 14 (commencing with Section 1010).

(13) Article 14.5 (commencing with Section 1065.1).

(14) Article 15 (commencing with Section 1070).

(15) Article 16 (commencing with Section 1080).

(16) Article 17 (commencing with Section 1100).

(e) These provisions of Chapter 2, Part 2, Division 1:

(1) Article 1 (commencing with Section 1140).

(2) Article 2 (commencing with Section 1150).

(3) Article 3 (commencing with Section 1170).

(4) Article 4 (commencing with Section 1190).

(5) Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 1215).

(6) Article 7 (commencing with Section 1250).

(7) Article 8 (commencing with Section 1260).

(f) Article 4 (commencing with Section 1610) of Chapter 4 of Part 2 of Division 1.

(g) Article 3 (commencing with Section 1631) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 1.

(h) Sections 1850, 1850.5, 1852, 1853.5, 1853.7, 1853.8, 1857, 1857.2, 1857.3, 1857.4, 1857.5, 1858, 1858.05, 1858.1, 1858.15, 1858.2, 1858.3, 1858.4, 1858.5, 1858.6, 1858.7, 1859, 1859.1, 1860, 1860.1, 1860.2 of Chapter 9, Part 2, Division 1.

(i) Division 3 (commencing with Section 12900).

(j) In any references in the provisions made applicable to this part by subdivisions (a) to (i) inclusive of this section:

(1) “Insurer” shall mean home protection company.

(2) “Insured” shall mean a home protection contract holder.

(3) “Premium” shall mean protection contract fee.

(4) “Policy” or “insurance” shall mean home protection contract.

(k) When any provision of this code, other than this part, is applied to home protection companies, such provision shall be construed in accordance with the nature of home protection companies and the home protection business. In the event of any conflict between such other provision and this part, this part shall prevail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 820, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

12744.

(a) No person shall issue or offer to issue home protection contracts in this state unless the person holds a home protection company license issued by the department, except as provided in subdivision (b) of this section.

(b) An insurer admitted for the class of insurance defined in Section 120 is authorized, in addition to the underwriting powers granted by the class, to issue home protection contracts, but the provisions of this part shall not be otherwise applicable to those insurers or their contracts.

(c) No license shall be granted to a foreign applicant that has not fulfilled the requirements of Sections 716 and
 717. For purposes of this part, the term “class of insurance” as used in said sections shall mean the business of a home protection company. This section shall not prohibit the admission of a foreign home protection company that has actively transacted home protection business in its state of domicile for three years or more.

(d) The commissioner shall by regulation prescribe forms for applications for home protection company licenses consistent with the provisions of this part. Any reference to certificate of authority in Article 3 (commencing with Section 699) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1, shall mean home protection company license.

(e) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) and, notwithstanding subdivision (c) or any regulation to the contrary, the following requirements shall not apply to any foreign applicant:

(A) Filing a financial statement certified by the applicant’s home state regulatory official as a true and correct copy of the statement filed with that official. This exemption applies only if the official does not require a home protection company or the applicant to file a financial statement.

(B) Filing an examination report certified by the applicant’s home state regulatory official as a true and correct copy. This exemption applies only if the official does not prepare examination reports of home protection companies or has not prepared an examination report of the applicant.

(C) Holding a certificate of authority as an insurance company.

(2) The exemptions described in paragraph (1) apply only if the applicant’s chief executive officer stipulates that
 the company will provide financial reports in the same manner required of domestic home protection companies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 324, Sec. 1.   (AB 1130)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

12745.

(a) Any insurance holding company subject to Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 1215) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 1, one of whose affiliates is a home protection company as defined in this part, may invest in or operate a corporation which provides home service contractor or dispatch services or appliance service or appliance repair services pursuant to a contract issued for that purpose. The corporation shall not be subject to licensing or regulation under this part except as set forth in this section, provided, that the contract shall not be sold in conjunction with, or otherwise attach to, the sale or any proposed sale of the real property to which it relates.

(b) At the time of filing its registration statement under Section 1215.4, and annually thereafter, each affiliate owning or operating such a corporation shall file as a supplement thereto, a statement of the financial condition of the corporation prepared according to generally accepted accounting principles, and a designated list of the name and addresses of all agents, employees, and independent contractors utilized to issue or sell those contracts. Each statement of financial condition and designated list shall be certified as correct by an officer of the corporation. The commissioner may prescribe the form for the statement or list.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 944, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Fiscal Requirements [12750. - 12757.]

12750.

(a) A home protection company which has issued or renewed an aggregate number of 1,000 or less contracts in the preceding calendar year shall maintain a minimum net worth of forty thousand dollars ($40,000) and for each additional 500 contracts, or fraction thereof, up to 10,000 contracts, an additional twenty thousand dollars ($20,000).

(b) Net worth is defined as the excess of admitted assets over all liabilities and required reserves. At least twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) of net worth shall consist of paid-in capital.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 820, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

12751.
